Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB12.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 211.492 is amended to read as follows:
As used in[For the purposes of] KRS 211.490 to 211.496:
(1) "Advanced practice provider" means:
(a) A physician assistant as defined in KRS 311.840; or
(b) An advanced practice registered nurse as defined in KRS 314.011;
(2) "Trauma" has the same meaning as[ defined] in KRS 311A.010;
(3)[(2)] "Trauma center" means a hospital that has institutional, surgical, and specialty
care and commitment to treating individuals with injuries and that has been verified
by the American College of Surgeons or by the Department for Public Health; and
(4)[(3)] "Trauma center verification" means the process by which a trauma center is
evaluated and designated as a trauma center by the American College of Surgeons
or the Department for Public Health.
Section 2. KRS 211.494 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A comprehensive statewide trauma care program shall be established within the
Department for Public Health. The statewide trauma care program shall consist of,
at a minimum, a statewide trauma care director and a state trauma registrar funded
through available federal funds or, to the extent that funds are available, by the
trauma care system fund established in KRS 211.496. The department may contract
with outside entities to perform these functions.
(2) The statewide trauma care system shall address, at a minimum, the following goals:
(a) To reduce or prevent death and disability from trauma without regard to the
patient's insurance coverage or ability to pay for services;
(b) To provide optimal care for trauma victims by utilization of best practices
protocols and guidelines;
(c) To minimize the economic impact of lost wages and productivity for trauma
Page 1 of 5
BR113700.100 - 1137 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1137
patients; and
(d) To contain costs of trauma care.
(3) (a) The Department for Public Health shall establish an advisory committee to
assist in the development, implementation, and continuation of its duties.
(b) The advisory committee shall consist of eighteen (18) members to be
appointed by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and
shall be composed of representatives from the following agencies and
organizations:
1. The Department for Public Health;
2. The Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure;
3. The Kentucky Board of Nursing;
4. The Kentucky Board of Emergency Medical Services;
5. The Kentucky Medical Association;
6. The Kentucky Hospital Association;
7. The Kentucky Committee on Trauma of the American College of
Surgeons;
8. One (1) representative from each[ verified] Level I verified trauma
center;
9. One (1) hospital representative from a Level II verified trauma center,
one (1) hospital representative from a Level III verified trauma center,
and one (1) hospital representative from a Level IV verified trauma
center. The Kentucky Hospital Association shall submit
recommendations to the secretary for each of the three (3) members
appointed under this subdivision;
10. The Kentucky Chapter of the American College of Emergency
Physicians;
11. The Kentucky Chapter of the Emergency Nurses Association;
Page 2 of 5
BR113700.100 - 1137 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1137
12. The Kentucky Transportation Cabinet;
13. Two (2) members at large, one (1) of whom shall be a health care
consumer;
14. One (1) representative with extensive experience in injury prevention
programs; and
15. One (1) representative with pediatric trauma experience.
(c) Members of the advisory committee shall serve for a period of four (4) years
and shall serve until a successor is appointed, except that initial terms shall be
staggered and one-third (1/3) of the members shall be appointed to four (4)
year terms, one-third (1/3) of the members shall be appointed to three (3) year
terms, and one-third (1/3) of the members shall be appointed for two (2) year
terms.
(d) The advisory committee shall meet at least on a quarterly basis. The
committee shall elect a chair, a vice chair, and a secretary from among its
members and adopt rules of governance at the first meeting in each fiscal
year.[ The first meeting of the advisory committee shall occur before
September 30, 2008.]
(e) Appointed members shall serve without compensation but may receive
reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses relating to the duties of the
advisory committee in accordance with state administrative regulations
relating to travel reimbursement.
(f) Expenses associated with the advisory committee shall be paid by the trauma
care system fund established in KRS 211.496, to the extent funds are
available.
(4) The statewide trauma care director and the advisory committee shall develop and
implement a statewide trauma care system, integrated with the public health system
for injury prevention, that recognizes levels of care for the appropriate delivery of a
Page 3 of 5
BR113700.100 - 1137 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1137
full range of medical services to all trauma patients in the Commonwealth. The
statewide trauma care system shall include but is not limited to:
(a) Development and implementation of trauma prevention and education
initiatives;
(b) Facilitation of appropriate education and continuing education about trauma
care and procedures for physicians, nurses, and emergency medical services
personnel;
(c) Development and statewide distribution of guidelines and protocols for the
care and treatment of trauma victims that include the needs of special
populations and are fully integrated with all available resources, including but
not limited to emergency medical services, physicians, nurses, and hospitals;
(d) Voluntary hospital trauma center verification through the American College
of Surgeons or the Department for Public Health;
(e) Local and regional triage and transport protocols for use by the Kentucky
Board of Emergency Medical Services, emergency medical services
providers, and emergency rooms; and
(f) Continuing quality assurance and peer review programs.
(5) The Department for Public Health or the statewide trauma care director and the
advisory committee established in this section shall coordinate activities related to
the care of trauma patients with other state agencies and boards that are directly or
indirectly involved with care of injured persons. Upon request of the Department
for Public Health or the statewide trauma care director, other state agencies and
boards shall assist and facilitate the development and implementation of a statewide
trauma care system.
(6) Data obtained through a trauma registry or other data collected pursuant to KRS
211.490 to 211.496 shall be confidential and for use solely by the Department for
Public Health, the statewide trauma care director, the advisory committee, and
Page 4 of 5
BR113700.100 - 1137 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1137
persons or public or private entities that participate in data collection for the trauma
registry. Personal identifying information that is collected for use in the trauma
registry shall not be subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil
action.
(7) The statewide trauma care director shall report information on the status of the
development and implementation of the statewide trauma system upon request.
(8) A hospital with a Level IV verified trauma center shall have on-site coverage of
the emergency department twenty-four (24) hours a day, seven (7) days a week,
by:
(a) A physician as defined in KRS 311.550; or
(b) An advanced practice provider who is supervised by an on-site or off-site
physician at all times.
(9) The Department for Public Health shall[may] promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section,
including to allow emergency department coverage by an advanced practice
provider in accordance with subsection (8) of this section.
Page 5 of 5
BR113700.100 - 1137 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:52 PM Jacketed